dev/zho.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post" c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="part" c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnj" c="Conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="x__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__part">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__cnj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="下"><i>下</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="两"><i>两</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="为"><i>为</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="五"><i>五</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="六"><i>六</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="到"><i>到</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="呀"><i>呀</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="嗯"><i>嗯</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="四"><i>四</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="戴"><i>戴</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="有"><i>有</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="朝"><i>朝</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="白"><i>白</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="见"><i>见</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="过"><i>过</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="这"><i>这</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="骑"><i>骑</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="一些"><i>一些</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="一般"><i>一般</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="为了"><i>为了</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="以前"><i>以前</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="以前"><i>以前</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以后"><i>以后</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="但是"><i>但是</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="你们"><i>你们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="劳驾"><i>劳驾</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="原来"><i>原来</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="反对"><i>反对</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="口语"><i>口语</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="因为"><i>因为</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="多少"><i>多少</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="它们"><i>它们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="尤其"><i>尤其</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="工作"><i>工作</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="年纪"><i>年纪</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="椅子"><i>椅子</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="特别"><i>特别</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="科学"><i>科学</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="结果"><i>结果</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="能够"><i>能够</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="表示"><i>表示</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="谢谢"><i>谢谢</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="还是"><i>还是</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="那个"><i>那个</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="一下儿"><i>一下儿</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="一块儿"><i>一块儿</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="对不起"><i>对不起</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="从...到..."><i>从...到...</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="一"><i>一</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="下"><i>下</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="两"><i>两</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="为"><i>为</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="了"><i>了</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="五"><i>五</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="人"><i>人</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="六"><i>六</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="到"><i>到</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="呀"><i>呀</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="喝"><i>喝</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="四"><i>四</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="对"><i>对</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="很"><i>很</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="忙"><i>忙</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="见"><i>见</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="过"><i>过</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="间"><i>间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="下午"><i>下午</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="不但"><i>不但</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="也许"><i>也许</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="以前"><i>以前</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以后"><i>以后</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="你们"><i>你们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="出来"><i>出来</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="分之"><i>分之</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="危险"><i>危险</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="同学"><i>同学</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="哪里"><i>哪里</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="大概"><i>大概</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="弟弟"><i>弟弟</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="所以"><i>所以</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="散步"><i>散步</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="暖和"><i>暖和</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="民族"><i>民族</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="永远"><i>永远</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="虽然"><i>虽然</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="贵姓"><i>贵姓</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="这个"><i>这个</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="进去"><i>进去</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="马上"><i>马上</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="一下儿"><i>一下儿</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="怎么样"><i>怎么样</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="有意思"><i>有意思</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="从...到..."><i>从...到...</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="一"><i>一</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="两"><i>两</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="为"><i>为</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="了"><i>了</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="五"><i>五</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="六"><i>六</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="只"><i>只</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="呀"><i>呀</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="和"><i>和</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="喂"><i>喂</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="四"><i>四</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="在"><i>在</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="早"><i>早</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="能"><i>能</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="见"><i>见</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="过"><i>过</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="这"><i>这</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="间"><i>间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="一定"><i>一定</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="一起"><i>一起</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以前"><i>以前</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以后"><i>以后</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="但是"><i>但是</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="听写"><i>听写</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="咳嗽"><i>咳嗽</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="因为"><i>因为</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="复杂"><i>复杂</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="它们"><i>它们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="有些"><i>有些</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="欢迎"><i>欢迎</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="汽水"><i>汽水</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="看见"><i>看见</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="着急"><i>着急</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="结果"><i>结果</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="辛苦"><i>辛苦</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="还是"><i>还是</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="那个"><i>那个</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="一下儿"><i>一下儿</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="没关系"><i>没关系</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="从...到..."><i>从...到...</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="两"><i>两</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="为"><i>为</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="云"><i>云</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="六"><i>六</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="别"><i>别</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="和"><i>和</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="少"><i>少</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="见"><i>见</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="不但"><i>不但</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="不同"><i>不同</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以后"><i>以后</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="你们"><i>你们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="再见"><i>再见</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="分之"><i>分之</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="别的"><i>别的</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="只好"><i>只好</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="商店"><i>商店</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="影响"><i>影响</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="所以"><i>所以</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="整齐"><i>整齐</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="活动"><i>活动</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="经常"><i>经常</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="解决"><i>解决</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="这个"><i>这个</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="那个"><i>那个</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="一点儿"><i>一点儿</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
